Maine, session 132, LD1776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA c. 32 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 32
INTERDISCIPLINARY ADVISORY BOARD FOR THE STATE HOUSE
COMPLEX
§911. Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for the State House Complex
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Board" means the Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for the State House Complex,
established pursuant to Title 5, section 12004-G, subsection 26-G.
B. "State House complex" means the State House and the Burton M. Cross Building
and their grounds.
2. Board established. The Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for the State House
Complex is established to work to ensure the occupational health and safety of Legislators,
legislative and executive branch staffs and the public within the State House complex and
to streamline communications regarding the State House complex among the Legislative
Council, the Legislative Council's State House facilities committee and the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services. The board may
establish committees, including a committee to better retain a record of the State House
complex's history of occupational health and safety issues and their mitigation and to
maintain consistency in the oversight of the occupational health and safety of Legislators,
legislative and executive branch staffs and the public within the State House complex.
3. Board membership; terms. The board consists of 13 members as follows:
A. A member nominated by the Executive Director of the Legislative Council,
appointed by the President of the Senate;
B. A member representing an association of executive branch and other public
employees, appointed by the President of the Senate;
C. A member representing a state indoor air quality organization, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
D. A member representing an international society of heating, refrigerating and air-
conditioning professionals who is a mechanical engineer, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
E. A year-round partisan or nonpartisan legislative staff member, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
F. A member representing occupational health and safety professionals, appointed by
the President of the Senate;
G. A member nominated by the Clerk of the House, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
Page 1 - 132LR2217(01)

H. A member representing a registered lobby with knowledge or expertise in public
health, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
I. A member representing the Board of Occupational Safety and Health, as established
by Title 5, section 12004-G, subsection 24, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
J. A member who is an architect with historic architectural experience who is
associated with a national professional organization for licensed architects and other
construction industry professionals, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
K. A union steward for legislative employees, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
L. A member representing a historic preservation organization in the State, appointed
by the Speaker of the House; and
M. The Director of the Bureau of General Services within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services or the director's designee.
Members of the board serve for 3-year terms. A vacancy in the membership of the board
must be timely filled by the appointing authority.
4. Chairs. The Director of the Bureau of General Services within the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services or the director's designee and the member
representing the Board of Occupational Safety and Health, as established by Title 5, section
12004-G, subsection 24, serve as cochairs of the board.
5. Duties. The board shall work to ensure the occupational health and safety of
Legislators, legislative and executive branch staffs and the public within the State House
complex. The board shall advise the Legislative Council and the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services regarding the
occupational health and safety of Legislators, legislative and executive branch staffs and
the public within the State House complex. The board shall provide and publicize a method
using the Legislature's publicly accessible website for Legislators, legislative and executive
branch staffs and the public to submit to the board questions and concerns regarding the
occupational health and safety of Legislators, legislative and executive branch staffs and
the public within the State House complex, a presentation regarding which must be
included in orientation of new Legislators and new employees of the legislative and
executive branch staffs working in the State House complex.
6. Meetings. The board shall meet quarterly.
7. Staff assistance. The Department of Labor shall provide necessary staffing services
to the board.
8. Report. The board, no later than the first Wednesday in December annually, shall
submit a report that includes its findings and recommendations for the past year for
presentation to the Legislature. The Executive Director of the Legislative Council shall
publish the report on the Legislature's publicly accessible website.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§26-G is enacted to read:
26-G.
Legislature/State Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for Not Authorized 3 MRSA
House Complex the State House Complex §911
Page 2 - 132LR2217(01)

Sec. 3. Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for State House Complex 2025
report. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 3, section 911, subsection 8,
the report of the Interdisciplinary Advisory Board for the State House, established pursuant
to Title 5, section 12004-G, subsection 26-G, made on December 3, 2025 may include any
findings and recommendations it may have from the time the board was first established to
December 3, 2025.